Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1592.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [10.1415] STATE SONGS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Hail! Minnesota. new text end new text begin The composition of the song "Hail! Minnesota," composed by Truman E. Rickard and Arthur E. Upson, is an official song of the state of Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Purple Rain. new text end new text begin The composition of the song "Purple Rain," composed by Prince and the Revolution, is an official song of the state of Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Girl from the North Country. new text end new text begin The composition of the song "Girl from the North Country," composed by Bob Dylan, is an official song of the state of Minnesota. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin COPYRIGHT IN STATE SONGS.new text end new text begin The designation of songs as state songs under Minnesota Statutes, section 10.1415, does not convey any right to perform the songs, create derivative works, or otherwise take action that would violate copyright rights in the songs or recordings of the songs. new text end